Washington statutes.
RCW 18.29.150

Examinations.

(1) The secretary shall establish the date and location of the examination. Applicants who meet the education requirements for licensure shall be scheduled for the next examination following the filing of the application. The secretary shall establish by rule the examination application deadline.

(2) The examination shall contain subjects appropriate to the scope of practice and on laws in the state of Washington regulating dental hygiene practice.

(3) The committee shall establish by rule the requirements for a reexamination if the applicant has failed the examination.

(4) The committee may approve an examination prepared or administered by a private testing agency or association of licensing authorities.

[ 1991 c 3 s 55; 1989 c 202 s 7.]